Idaho, session 2025, H0153.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-1007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1007. ISSUANCE OF LICENSES -- RECIPROCITY. (1) The administrator
shall issue licenses to such persons as have by examination shown themselves
to be fit, competent and qualified to engage in the trade of residential
electrician, journeyman electrician, limited electrical installer or mas-
ter electrician as defined in section 54-1003A, Idaho Code, and to such
persons, firms, partnerships, associations or corporations as have shown
themselves to be fit, competent and qualified to engage in the business of
electrical contracting or limited electrical contracting as defined in sec-
tion 54-1003A, Idaho Code.
(2) An apprentice electrician, as defined in section 54-1003A, Idaho
Code, may take the journeyman's examination if he has completed the required
related instruction for electrical apprentices as approved by the Idaho
state board for career technical education, completion of which shall be
evidenced by a certificate from an approved provider, and has worked the
number of hours as prescribed by the Idaho electrical board, provided that
for all the time he is claiming to have worked as an apprentice electrician,
the apprentice shall have been registered with the division of occupational
and professional licenses as an apprentice. The electrical board may by rule
fix the apprentice registration fee, in an amount not to exceed the costs of
issuing apprentice registration certificates and enforcing the apprentice
registration provisions of this chapter, and may also by rule establish re-
quirements relative to the manner of registration renewal, verification of
employment, the number of instructional hours completed, and the number of
hours worked.
(3) Any person who has worked as a licensed journeyman for a period of
not less than four (4) years and who has worked the number of hours as pre-
scribed by rule of the board as a licensed journeyman electrician shall be
considered as qualified to apply for a master electrician's license in this
state. The Idaho electrical board, in establishing by rule the requirements
for a master electrician's license, shall also take into account the appli-
cant's performance as a journeyman electrician. When issuing a master elec-
trician's license to a person, the administrator shall also issue a journey-


man electrician's license to such person at no additional cost and without
any additional requirements beyond those required to receive a master elec-
trician's license.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, any person who can
demonstrate eight (8) years of work experience, defined as a minimum of six-
teen thousand (16,000) hours, making electrical installations on the job,
shall be considered as qualified to apply for a journeyman electrician's li-
cense in this state.
(5) A person qualifies for a residential electrician license if he
passes the residential electrician examination approved by the board, has
completed a two (2) year course of related instruction for residential
electrical apprentices as approved by the Idaho electrical board and the
Idaho state board for career technical education, and submits proof of four
thousand (4,000) hours of electrical experience as an Idaho-registered ap-
prentice or in accordance with the requirements of the jurisdiction where
the applicant obtained such experience. Completion of an approved course
as required pursuant to this subsection shall be evidenced by a certificate
from an approved provider. An applicant for a journeyman electrician li-
cense may utilize the experience hours identified in this section toward the
work experience requirement for a journeyman electrician license.
(6) To the extent that other states that provide for the licensing
of electricians require qualifications at least equal to those contained
in this chapter, the administrator may enter reciprocal agreements with
such other states to grant licenses to electricians licensed by such other
states. The administrator, on the recommendation of the Idaho electrical
board, may grant licenses to electricians licensed by such other states upon
payment by the applicant of the required fee and upon furnishing proof to the
board that the applicant has qualifications at least equal to those provided
herein for applicants for written examinations. Applicants who qualify for
a license under this subsection are not required to take a written examina-
tion.
(7) A provisional journeyman electrician, as defined in section
54-1003A, Idaho Code, may take the residential electrician or journeyman
electrician examination. Upon passing the examination, the administrator
of the division of occupational and professional licenses shall issue the
provisional journeyman electrician a residential or journeyman electri-
cian's license.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-1014, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1014. FEES. The administrator of the division of occupational and
professional licenses shall charge the following fees:
(1) Application for license or registration $15.00
(2) Six-month licenses:
(a) Provisional journeyman electrician license $55.00
(b) Provisional journeyman electrician license renewal 45.00
(i) If a provisional journeyman electrician applies for a res-
idential electrician or journeyman electrician license, the pro
rata value of any time remaining on his provisional journeyman
electrician license shall be credited toward the application fee


for the residential electrician or journeyman electrician li-
cense.
(3) One-year licenses and registration, in accordance with sections
54-1008 and 54-1013, Idaho Code:
(a) Electrical contractor license $125.00
(b) Electrical contractor license renewal 100.00
(c) Electrical contractor license revival 125.00
(d) Limited electrical contractor license 125.00
(e) Limited electrical contractor license renewal 100.00
(f) Limited electrical contractor license revival 125.00
(g) Facility account license 125.00
(h) Apprentice electrician registration 15.00
(i) At the time the apprentice applies for a residential electri-
cian or journeyman electrician license, the pro rata value of any
remaining time on an apprentice electrician working license shall
be credited toward the purchase of the residential electrician or
journeyman electrician license.
(i) Apprentice electrician registration renewal 15.00
(j) Apprentice electrician registration revival 15.00
(4) Three-year licenses and registration, in accordance with sections
54-1008 and 54-1013, Idaho Code:
(a) Master and journeyman electrician license $65.00
(b) Master and journeyman electrician license renewal 45.00
(c) Master and journeyman electrician license revival 55.00
(d) Journeyman or residential electrician license 55.00
(e) Journeyman or residential electrician license renewal 45.00
(f) Journeyman or residential electrician license revival 55.00
(g) Limited electrical installer license 55.00
(h) Limited electrical installer license renewal 45.00
(i) Limited electrical installer license revival 55.00
(j) Limited electrical installer trainee registration 30.00
(i) At the time the limited electrical installer trainee applies
for a limited electrical installer license, the pro rata value of
any remaining time on a limited electrical installer trainee work-
ing license shall be credited toward the purchase of the limited
electrical installer license.
(k) Limited electrical installer trainee registration renewal 25.00
(l) Limited electrical installer trainee registration revival 30.00
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.